Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB246.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 258.095 TO 258.500 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall provide comprehensive evidence-informed training for animal
control officers on child abuse and neglect recognition and reporting that
encompasses child physical, sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect.
(2) The training may be provided in person or by utilizing currently available
technology and shall cover, at a minimum, current information regarding the
connection between animal abuse as a predictor crime with a statistically
significant correlation to active or future instances of interpersonal violence such
as child abuse, domestic violence, elder abuse, and sexual assault.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section:
(a) All animal control officers shall complete the training by January 31, 2027;
and
(b) Animal control officers employed, appointed, or contracted with on or after
January 31, 2027, shall complete the training within one hundred twenty
(120) days of being employed, appointed, or contracted.
(4) This section shall not expand, modify, or create additional reporting obligations
for an animal control officer beyond those required under KRS 209.030 or
620.030 or other applicable law.
(5) (a) An animal control officer who, in the course of performing official duties,
has reasonable cause to believe that a child or vulnerable adult is abused,
neglected, or exploited shall satisfy any obligation arising under this section
by making a report in accordance with KRS 209.030 or 620.030 or other
applicable law.
(b) This section shall not require an animal control officer to conduct an
Page 1 of 2
HB024610.100 - 1416 - XXXX 3/2/2026 4:38 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 246/GA
independent investigation or assessment beyond the officer's statutory
authority relating to animal control.
(6) An animal control officer and the employing unit of local government shall not
be subject to civil liability for any good-faith act or omission related to the
recognition or reporting of suspected abuse or neglect pursuant to this section.
(7) A unit of local government that employs, appoints, or contracts with an animal
control officer may opt out of the training under this section by providing written
notice to the board by December 31, 2026. A unit of local government that opts
out under this subsection may subsequently opt in by providing written notice to
the board.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as Kyan's Law.
Page 2 of 2
HB024610.100 - 1416 - XXXX 3/2/2026 4:38 PM GA